apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="p/utiri__vbmod">
      	<e><p><l>utiri</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>utiri</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>utìri</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Presento de Indicativo  -->
      	<e><p><l>ozzu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>oi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>ò</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>pò</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>po</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>utemu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>utiti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>onnu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ònnu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>utennu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	
    	 <!-- Imperativo -->
    	<e><p><l>o</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ozza</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utissi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utemu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utiti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>utissiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ò</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>òzza</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>utìssi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>utèmu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>utìti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ozza</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utissi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utemu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utiti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>utissiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
    	 <!-- Pretérito de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>otti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utisti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>otti</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>òsimu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>osimu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>unìstivu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>unistivu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>òsiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>osiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Subjuntivo -->
        <e><p><l>utìssi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssimu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssivu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìssiru</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>utìa</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utia</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utivi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utìa</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>otìa</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utia</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utìamu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utiamu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>utìavu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utiavu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>utìanu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utianu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	 <!-- Two alternative forms: with "eva" and with "iva". Forms without accent accepted.  -->
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uteva</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utiva</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utevi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utivi</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>uteva</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utiva</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utèvamu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utìvamu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utèvavu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utìvavu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utèvanu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utìvanu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utevamu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utivamu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utevavu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>utivavu</l><r>utiri<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="putiri"><i>p</i><par n="p/utiri__vbmod"/></e>
